Mississippi, session 2026, HB1336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) As used in this section, the term "buy and bill process" means a reimbursement model in which a health care provider purchases specialty medications from a specialty distributor, stores the medications in-house to have an inventory of the medications, administers the medications to patients in their office or in a clinic setting, and then submits a claim for the administered medication for reimbursement to a third-party payer. (2)  Health care providers shall not use the buy and bill process for purchasing and administering medications used for treatment of cancer. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.